Utah statutes.
67-19a-405.   Prehearing conference.

(1)  The administrator may require the presence of each party, the representatives of each party, and other designated persons at a prehearing conference.

(2)  At the conference, the administrator may require the parties to:

(a)  identify which allegations are admitted and which allegations are denied;

(b)  submit a joint statement detailing:

(i)  stipulated facts that are not in dispute;

(ii)  the issues to be decided; and

(iii)  applicable laws and rules;

(c)  submit a list of witnesses, exhibits, and papers or other evidence that each party intends to offer as evidence; and

(d)  confer in an effort to resolve or settle the grievance.

(3)  At the conclusion of the prehearing conference, the administrator may require the parties to prepare a written statement identifying:

(a)  the items presented or agreed to under Subsection (2); and

(b)  the issues remaining to be resolved by the hearing process.

(4)  The prehearing conference is informal and is not open to the public or press.

